Hawaii statutes.
§121-16 Examination of officers and warrant
officers. Every officer and warrant officer of the army or air national
guard, except those for whom federal recognition is not required shall, upon
the officer's or warrant officer's appointment to an office and assignment to a
unit, upon official orders, appear before an examining board and successfully
pass such test as to the officer's or warrant officer's physical, moral, and
professional fitness as may be prescribed by the secretary of the army or the air
force. [L 1967, c 196, pt of §1; HRS §121-16; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next